Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-944
Registration, defined.

(1) Registration means a nontransferable registration granted to an individual under which (a) the individual is required to give notice to the government that may include the individual's name and address, the individual's agent for service of process, the location of the activity to be performed, and a description of the service the individual provides, (b) upon receipt of the notice by the government, the individual may use the term registered as a designated title to engage in a lawful occupation, and (c) such notice is required to engage in the lawful occupation for compensation and is required in order to use the term registered as a designated title to engage in the lawful occupation.

(2) Registration may require a bond or insurance.

(3) For purposes of the Occupational Board Reform Act, in analyzing health professions which are subject to the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, the definition of registration in section 71-6217 applies.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 12.

Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, see section 71-6201.